Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB786.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.592 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, pregnant women, new
parents[mothers] up to twenty-four (24)[twelve (12)] months postpartum, and
children up to age one (1) shall be eligible for participation in the Kentucky
Medical Assistance Program if:
(a) They have family income up to but not exceeding one hundred and eighty-five
percent (185%) of the nonfarm income official poverty guidelines as
promulgated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services
[of the United States ]as revised annually; and
(b) They are otherwise eligible for the program.
(2) The percentage established in subsection (1)(a) of this section may be increased to
the extent:
(a) Permitted under federal law; and
(b) Funding is available.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/19/2025 11:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 849
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/19/2025 11:08 AM Jacketed